Utah statutes.
13-24-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)  "Improper means" includes theft, bribery, misrepresentation, breach or
inducement of a breach of a duty to maintain secrecy, or espionage through
electronic or other means.
(2)  "Misappropriation" means:
(a)  acquisition of a trade secret of another by a person who knows or has
reason to know that the trade secret was acquired by improper means; or
(b)  disclosure or use of a trade secret of another without express or implied
consent by a person who:
(i)  used improper means to acquire knowledge of the trade secret; or
(ii)  at the time of disclosure or use, knew or had reason to know that his
knowledge of the trade secret was:
(A)  derived from or through a person who had utilized improper means to
acquire it;
(B)  acquired under circumstances giving rise to a duty to maintain its
secrecy or limit its use; or
(C)  derived from or through a person who owed a duty to the person seeking
relief to maintain its secrecy or limit its use; or
(iii)  before a material change of his position, knew or had reason to know
that it was a trade secret and that knowledge of it had been acquired by
accident or mistake.
(3)  "Person" means a natural person, corporation, business trust, estate,
trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government, governmental
subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(4)  "Trade secret" means information, including a formula, pattern,
compilation, program, device, method, technique, or process, that:
(a)  derives independent economic value, actual or potential, from not being
generally known to, and not being readily ascertainable by proper means by,
other persons who can obtain economic value from its disclosure or use; and
(b)  is the subject of efforts that are reasonable under the circumstances to
maintain its secrecy.
